src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON HALIHIT_TV !!≈ * **@CODE@** Like MUITTASJ_TV, without COnNeg so we dont get hálit
 +V+TV:%> PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> DeverbalNounsMUITTASJTV ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»išgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj ;
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs:%> PrsC1 ;
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>an 12pflagK ;
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>at 12pflagK ;
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>a K ;
!+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%> K ;     !SUB Poetic form
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>eahppi 12pflagK ;
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>eaba K ;
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Dial/-KJ:%>it 12pflagK ; ! mii muitalit
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Dial/-GG:%>at 12pflagK ; ! mii muitalat
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ehpe%>t 12pflagK ;
! +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%> K ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt:%> PrtC ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Cond+Prs:%>ivčče%> CondC ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Cond+Prs+Err/Orth:%>ivččo%> CondC ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>ivččii K ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:%>eaš K ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>eš K ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:%>eaš K ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:%>eačča K ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>eš K ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Prs:%>eačča PrsV1 ; !1,2
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Prs+Use/NG:%>eažžá PrsV2 ; !  !3
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Prs:%>ežže PrsV3 ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Prt:%>eažža%> PrtV ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Prs:%>eažža PrsV5 ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt:%> ImprtSg2 ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> ImprtC ;
  +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> NominalFormsC ;


!   2d. other special lexicas
!   ---------------------------------------------


LEXICON LAHKAN_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** lahkanit, lahkonit, are nowadays used transitively
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> MUITALINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsLASSAN ;
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll: DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON GEAGAT_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Trisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsALIST ;
! This lexicon goes as ALIST except for the TV tag.
! The reason is that geagadit takes acc objects, but does not have passive.

LEXICON BUOVVAL_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  buovvalit, guoigalit. Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsSUOTNJAL ;





! Substems for trisyllabic verbs
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -


LEXICON COASKKITCnj
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:»išgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll: SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Gram/3syll:%>a K ;
!+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Gram/3syll: K ; !SUB Poetic form
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Gram/3syll:%>ij K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Gram/3syll: K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Gram/3syll:%>ivčči%>i K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth+Gram/3syll:%>ivčču%>i K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Gram/3syll:%>ivčče K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth+Gram/3syll:%>ivččo K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG+Gram/3syll:%>eažžá K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG+Gram/3syll:%>eaš K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Gram/3syll:%>eš K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG+Gram/3syll:%>eačča K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG+Gram/3syll:%>eaš K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Gram/3syll:%>eš K ;
 +V+IV+Imprt+Sg3+Gram/3syll:%>ehko%>s ENDLEX ;
 +V+IV+Inf+Gram/3syll:%>it K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom+Gram/3syll:»eapmi K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen+Gram/3syll:»eami K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG+Gram/3syll:»eami%> R ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen+Gram/3syll:»eame%> R ;
! +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc+Use/NG+Gram/3syll:»eame K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc+Gram/3syll:»eami K ;
! +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen+Gram/3syll:»eame K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG+Gram/3syll:eapmi%>X8 K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Gram/3syll:»an R ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill+Gram/3syll:»eapmá%>i K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Gram/3syll:eapmi%>n K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc+Use/NG+Gram/3syll:»eami%>s K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc+Gram/3syll:»eame%>s K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Gram/3syll:»emi%>jn K ;
! +V+IV+Actio+Nom+Gram/3syll:%>eapmi K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Nom+Gram/3syll:%>an K ; ! ! shortened (reintro)
 +V+IV+Actio+Gen+Gram/3syll:%>an K ; ! ! shortened (reintro)
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess+Gram/3syll:%>eame K ;
! +V+IV+Actio+Ess+Err/Orth+Gram/3syll:%>eami K ; ! -eami not Actio Ess
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess+Err/Orth+Gram/3syll:%>eami%>n K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess+Use/NG+Gram/3syll:%>eame%>n K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Loc+Gram/3syll:%>eame%>s K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Loc+Use/NG+Gram/3syll:%>eami%>s K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Com+Gram/3syll:%>emi%>jn K ;
 +V+IV+Ger+Gram/3syll:%>ettiin K ;
 +V+IV+Ger+Err/Orth+Gram/3syll:%>ettin K ;
! +V+IV+Ger+Gram/3syll:%>ettiin%> PxC ; !Not likely
 +V+IV+PrfPrc+Gram/3syll:%>an K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Gram/3syll:%>an K ;
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll:# VABESS ;
! +V+IV+A+Attr+Err/Orth+Gram/3syll:#ha K ;
 +V+IV+Sup+Gram/3syll:%>eažžat K ; ! Rare form !!

LEXICON MUITALStem
 PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»supmái K ;  !not for unevenstems
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsCTV ;

LEXICON OAHPAHITStem
 PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»supmái K ;  !not for unevenstems
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsMUITALTV ;
  +Der2+Der/NomAg+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:»eaddji¤» ACTORSHORTTVder ;


LEXICON MUITTASJStem
 PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»supmái K ; !not for unevenstems
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsMUITTASJTV ;


LEXICON MUITALINCH
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»išgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»isgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj ;
 MUITALCnj ;

LEXICON MUITALCnj  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Substems for Consonantal Verb Stems
 +Ind+Prs: PrsC ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtC ;
 +Cond+Prs:ivčče%> CondC ;
 +Cond+Prs+Err/Orth:ivččo%> CondC ;
 +Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:ivččii K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:eaš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:eš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:eaš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:eačča K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg:eš K ;
! +Pot+Prs:eažža%> PrsV ; !replaced by individual pointers, because of ped. proj
 +Pot+Prs:eačča PrsV1 ; !1,2
 +Pot+Prs+Use/NG:eažžá PrsV2 ; !  !3
 +Pot+Prs:ežže PrsV3 ;
 +Pot+Prt:eažža%> PrtV ;
! +Pot+Prs:Q6 PrsV4 ;
 +Pot+Prs:eažža PrsV5 ;
 +Imprt: ImprtSg2 ;
 ImprtC ;
 NominalFormsC ;

LEXICON HURAIINCH
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:d»išgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj ;
 HURAICnj ;

LEXICON HURAICnj  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Substems for  Words ending -aidit
 +Ind+Prs:d%> PrsC ;
 +Ind+Prt:d%> PrtC ;
 +Cond+Prs:d%>ivčče%> CondC ;
 +Cond+Prs+Err/Orth:d%>ivččo%> CondC ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:d%>eaš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:d%>eš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:d%>eaš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg:d%>eš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:d%>eačča K ;
! +Pot+Prs:d%>eažža%> PrsV ; !replaced by individual pointers, because of ped. proj
 +Pot+Prs:d%>eačča PrsV1 ; !1,2
 +Pot+Prs+Use/NG:d%>eažžá PrsV2 ; !  !3
 +Pot+Prs:d%>ežže PrsV3 ;
! +Pot+Prs:d%>Q6 PrsV4 ;
 +Pot+Prs:d%>eažža PrsV5 ;
 +Imprt:d%> ImprtSg2 ;
 :d%> ImprtC ;
 +Inf:d%>it K ;
 +Sup:d%>eažžat K ; ! Rare form !!
! +Actio+Nom:d%>eapmi K ;
! +Actio+Nom+Err/Orth:d%>eapme K ;
 +Actio+Gen:d%>an K ; ! shortened (reintro?)
 +Actio+Nom:d%>an K ; ! shortened (reintro?)
 +Actio+Ess:d%>eame K ;
! +Actio+Ess+Err/Orth:d%>eami K ; ! -eami is not Actio Ess
 +Actio+Ess+Err/Orth:d%>eami%>n K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Dial/-GG:d%>eame%>n K ;
 +Actio+Loc:d%>eame%>s K ;
 +Actio+Loc+Use/NG:d%>eami%>s K ;
 +Actio+Com:d%>emi%>jn K ;
 +Ger:d%>ettiin K ;
 +Ger+Err/Orth:d%>ettin K ;
 +Ger:d%>ettiin%> PxC ;
 +PrfPrc:d%>an K ;
 +Ind+Prt+ConNeg:d%>an K ;
 :d# VABESS ;
 +VGen: VGEN ;
 +PrsPrc+Use/-Spell:d%>eaddji Kflag ;


LEXICON CondC
 +ConNeg: K ;
 PrtV ;





LEXICON ALISTStem
 SG3PASS ;
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON NUOSKITStem
 SG3PASS ;
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsNUOSKIT ;

LEXICON BEAGASJStem
 SG3PASS ;
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsMUITTASJ ;

LEXICON HURAIStem
 :d%> SG3PASS ;
 HURAIINCH ;
 :d%> DeverbalNounsMUITTASJ ;






! Passives and impersonals
! ------------------------
