src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
lahkanit:lahkan LAHKAN_TV ;
lahkonit:lahkon LAHKAN_TV ;
lahkonit+Err/Orth-a-á:láhkon LAHKAN_TV ;
láhttestit:láhttest GEAGAT_TV ;
LEXICON 3-VerbRoot
buovadit:buovad GEAGAT_TV ;
buovvalit:buovval BUOVVAL_TV ;
báttástit:báttást GEAGAT_TV ;
geagadit:geagad GEAGAT_TV ;
geagihit:geagih GEAGAT_TV ;
guoigalit:guojgal BUOVVAL_TV ;
hálihit:hálih HALIHIT_TV ;
niibbástit:nijbbást GEAGAT_TV ;
ruovddástit:ruovddást GEAGAT_TV ;
soappástit:soappást GEAGAT_TV ;
sáittástit:sájttást GEAGAT_TV ;
